en: Frozen beef, Frozen beef meat
fr: Bœuf surgelé, Viande de bœuf surgelée

en: Fruits and vegetables based foods
ca: Aliments amb base de fruites i verdures
da: Frugt- og grøntsagsbaserede fødevarer
de: Frucht- und gemüsebasierte Lebensmittel
es: Frutas y verduras y sus productos
fi: Hedelmä- ja vihannespohjaiset ruoat
fr: Aliments à base de fruits et de légumes
he: מזון מבוסס פירות וירקות
hr: Hrana na bazi voća i povrća
hu: Gyümölcsök és zöldségek alapú élelmiszerek
it: Cibi a base di frutta e verdura
ja: 果物と野菜をベースにした食品
ko: 과일과 채소 기반 식품
lt: Vaisių ir daržovių maistas
nl: Voedsel op basis van fruit en groenten
no: Frukt- og grønnsaksbaserte matvarer
pl: Produkty na bazie warzyw i owoców
pt: Alimentos à base de frutas e legumes
ru: Продукты из фруктов или овощей
sv: Matvaror baserade på frukt och grönsaker
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากผักและผลไม้
tr: Meyve ve sebze kaynaklı gıdalar, Meyve ve sebze kaynaklı yiyecekler, Meyve ve sebze kaynaklı besinler
zh: 以水果和蔬菜为基础的食品

en: Fruits-vegetables-nuts-seeds variety packs
de: Obst-Gemüse-Nüsse-Samen - Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de frutas - verduras - frutos secos y semillas
fr: Assortiments de Fruits - Légumes - Noix et Graines
hr: Raznovrsna pakiranja voća-povrća-orašastih plodova-sjemenki
it: Confezioni miste di semi - frutta - verdura e frutta a guscio
nl: Assortimenten van fruit - groenten - noten en zaadjes
pt: Packs variados de frutas - legumes - nozes y sementes

en: Fruit-based foods, Fruits based foods
ca: Aliments amb base de fruites
da: Frugtbaserede fødevarer
de: Fruchtbasierte Lebensmittel
es: Comida a base de frutas
fi: Hedelmäpohjaiset ruoat
fr: Aliments à base de fruits
he: מזון מבוסס פירות
hr: Hrana na bazi voća
hu: Gyümölcs alapú élelmiszerek, Gyümölcs alapú termékek
it: Cibi a base di frutta
lt: Vaisių maisto produktai
pt: Alimentos à base de frutas
ru: блюда из фруктов
sv: Matvaror baserade på frukt, Fruktbaserade matvaror, Fruktbaserat mat
tr: Meyve kaynaklı yiyecekler, Meyve kaynaklı gıdalar, Meyve kaynaklı besinler

en: Fruits
bg: Плодове
ca: Fruita fresca
cs: Ovoce
da: Frugt, Frugter
de: Früchte
es: Frutas
fi: hedelmät
fr: Fruits
he: פירות
hr: Voće
hu: Gyümölcsök
it: Frutta
ja: 果物
lt: Vaisiai
nl: Fruit
pl: Owoce
pt: Frutas
ro: Fructe
ru: Фрукты
sv: Frukter, Frukt
th: ผลไม้
tr: Meyveler
zh: 水果

en: Belgian fruits
fr: Fruits belges
hr: Belgijsko voće
lt: Belgiški vaisiai

en: Belgian vegetables
fr: Légumes belges
hr: Belgijsko povrće
lt: Belgiškos daržovės

en: Dutch fruits
fr: Fruits néerlandais
hr: Nizozemsko voće
lt: Nyderlandiški vaisiai

en: Vegetables from the Netherlands, Dutch vegetables
fr: Légumes du Pays-Bas, Légumes néerlandais
hr: Nizozemsko povrće
lt: Nyderlandiškos daržovės
nl: Groenten uit Nederland, Nederlandse groenten

en: Fresh fruits
bg: Пресни плодове
da: Friske frugter, Frisk frugt
de: Frische Früchte
es: Frutas frescas
fr: Fruits frais
hr: Svježe voće
it: Frutta fresca
lt: Švieži vaisiai
nl: Vers fruit
pt: Frutas frescas
ru: Свежие фрукты
sv: Färska frukter

en: French fruits
da: Fransk frugt
de: Französische Früchte
es: Frutas francesas
fi: Ranskalaiset hedelmät
fr: Fruits français
hr: Francusko voće
it: Frutta francese
lt: Prancūziški vaisiai

en: British fruit
da: Britisk frugt
fr: Fruits britanniques
hr: Britansko voće
lt: Britiški vaisiai

en: Austrian fruit
da: Østrigsk frugt
fr: Fruits autrichiens
hr: Austrijsko voće
lt: Austriški vaisiai

en: Austrian vegetables
da: Østrigske grøntsager
fr: Légumes autrichiens
hr: Austrijsko povrće
lt: Austriškos daržovės

en: Armagh Bramley Apples
fr: Pommes Bramley, Bramley

en: Spanish fruits, Fruits from Spain
da: Spanske frugter
fr: Fruits espagnols
hr: Španjolsko voće
lt: Ispaniški vaisiai

en: Vegetables from Spain, Spanish vegetables
da: Spanske grøntsager
fr: Légumes espagnols
hr: Španjolsko povrće
lt: Ispaniškos daržovės

en: Vegetables from Italy, Italian vegetables
da: Italienske grøntsager
nl: Groenten uit Italië

en: Spanish cereals, Cereals from Spain
fr: Céréales espagnoles
hr: Španjolske žitarice
lt: Ispaniški javai

en: Spanish legumes, Beans from Spain
lt: Ispaniški ankštiniai augalai